Hawaii, session 2026, HB184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 291C-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1. By adding five new definitions to be appropriately inserted and to read: ""Class 1 electric bicycle" means an electric bicycle equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling, and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour. "Class 2 electric bicycle" means an electric bicycle equipped with a motor that may be used exclusively to propel the bicycle and that is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour. "Class 3 electric bicycle" means an electric bicycle equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty-eight miles per hour and equipped with a speedometer. "Electric bicycle" means a bicycle equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of no more than seven hundred fifty watts. "Electric bicycle" does not include a high-speed electric device. "High-speed electric device" means a two-wheeled electric device with a motor exceeding seven hundred fifty watts and capable of speeds over twenty-eight miles per hour.  "High-speed electric device" does not include a moped or motorcycle that can legally be operated on a road or street, as provided by law." 2. By amending the definition of "bicycle" to read: ""Bicycle" means: (1)  A vehicle propelled solely by human power upon which any person may ride, having two tandem wheels, and including any vehicle generally recognized as a bicycle though equipped with two front or two rear wheels except a toy bicycle; or [(2)  A low-speed electric bicycle, as defined under title 15 United States Code section 2085.] (2)  An electric bicycle." SECTION 2.  Section 291C-143.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§291C-143.5[]]  [Low-speed electric] Electric bicycles; operator [age.] requirements.  (a) No person under the age of fifteen shall operate a [low-speed] class 3 electric bicycle [as defined under title 15 United States Code section 2085].  No person sixteen years of age or older shall operate a class 3 electric bicycle unless they satisfy one of the following: (1)  Possesses a valid driver's license, instruction permit, or provisional license at all times; or (2)  Completes and prints a State of Hawaii driver's license application for a motorcycle instruction permit; provided that: (A)  The person shall not be required to take the motorcycle written test; and (B)  If the person does not possess a driver's license pursuant to section 286-102(b)(3), the person shall have taken and passed the general driver knowledge examination; provided that the person shall not be required to complete a road test. (b) Any individual may operate a class 1 electric bicycle or class 2 electric bicycle, regardless of their age. (c)  This section shall only apply to a county with a population of five hundred thousand or more." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.